tr: Yakalama yöntemi: Ölümcül; Canlı yakalama; Diğer
es: Método de captura: Letal; Captura viva; Otro
zh-TW: 捕捉方式: 致命; 活捉; 其他
ja: キャプチャ方法: 致死性; 生け捕り; その他
da: Fangstmetode: Dræbende; Levendefangst; Andet
sk-SK: Metóda snímania: Smrtiace; Živolovné; Iné
bg-BG: Метод на улавяне: Летален; Жив улов; Друго
cs: Způsob odchytu: Smrtící; Živý odchyt; Jiné
fr: Méthode de capture: Létal; Capture à vif; Autre
vi: Phương pháp bắt giữ: Tiêu diệt; Bắt sống; Khác
pl: Metoda przechwytywania: Śmiertelna; Żywołowna; Inne
ru: Метод отлова: Летальный; Отлов живьем; Другое
lt-LT: Sugavimo metodas: Mirtinas; Gyvų gaudymas; Kita
it: Metodo di acquisizione: Letale; Cattura incruenta; Altro
sl-SI: Metoda ujemanja: Smrtonosno; Živolov; Drugo
nb: Opptaksmetode: Dødelig; Levende fangst; Annet
fi: Pyydystysmenetelmä: Tappava; Elävänä pyytävä; Muu
hr-HR: Metoda snimanja: Smrtonosno; Hvatanje živih životinja; Ostalo
pt-PT: Método de captura: Letal; Captura viva; Outro
sv: Infångningsmetod: Dödlig; Levandefångst; Annat
th: วิธีการจับ: แบบสังหาร; แบบจับเป็น; อื่นๆ
ko: 포획 방식: 살상; 생포; 기타
de: Fangmethode: Tödlich; Lebendfang; Sonstige
hu: Befogási módszer: Halálos; Élvefogó; Egyéb
pt-BR: Método de captura: Letal; Captura viva; Outro
nl: Vangmethode: Dodelijk; Levend vangen; Overige
ro-RO: Metoda de capturare: Letal; Capturare în viață; Altele
zh-CN: 捕获方式: 致命; 活体捕捉; 其他
el: Μέθοδος καταγραφής: Θανατηφόρο; Σύλληψη ζωντανού ζώου; Άλλο
en: Capture method: Lethal; Live capture; Other